New York, session 2025-2026, S433.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 54.40 of the local finance law, as amended by chap- 2 ter 131 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 54.40 Bonds and notes of the city of Yonkers. Subject to the 4 provisions of the New York state financial emergency act of nineteen 5 hundred eighty-four for the city of Yonkers, to facilitate the marketing 6 of any issue of serial bonds or notes of the city of Yonkers issued on 7 or before June thirtieth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-six, such 8 city may, notwithstanding any limitations on private sales of bonds 9 provided by law, and subject to approval by the state comptroller of the 10 terms and conditions of such sale: (a) arrange for the underwriting of 11 its bonds or notes at private sale through negotiated agreement, compen- 12 sation for such underwriting to be provided by negotiated fee or by sale 13 of such bonds or notes to an underwriter at a price of less than the sum 14 of par value of, and the accrued interest on, such obligations; or (b) 15 arrange for the private sale of its bonds or notes through negotiated 16 agreement, compensation for such sales to be provided by negotiated fee, 17 if required. The cost of such underwriting or private placement shall be 18 deemed a preliminary cost for purposes of section 11.00 of this article. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01402-01-5